Hawaii statutes.
[§641-18] Time for appeal in case of
suspended sentence. Whenever in any criminal cause an order suspending the
imposition or execution of the sentence is entered by a district or circuit
court, the order shall for the purposes of appeal be deemed a final judgment
and the time within which to perfect any appeal in any such cause shall
commence to run from the entry thereof. [L 1941, c 66, §1; RL 1945, §9502; RL
1955, §208-2; HRS §641-41; am L 1970, c 188, §39; am L 1972, c 89, pt of §5;
ren HRS §641-18]

Rules of Court

What constitutes judgment and entry of judgment, see HRPP
rule 32(c).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next